Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2452.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of cribs, crib mattresses or strollers during the exclusion period to an individual purchaser for nonbusiness use. The following shall apply:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (i) The department shall publish a notice on the department's publicly accessible Internet website to give guidance on the implementation of the exclusions under this clause.(ii) For the purposes of this clause:(A) "Crib" shall mean a bed that is designed to provide sleeping accommodations for an infant to be used in a home, a child-care facility, a family child-care home or a place of public accommodation affecting commerce.(B) "Crib mattress" shall mean a pad filled with a resilient material used alone or in combination with other products intended or promoted for an infant to sleep in a crib.(C) "Exclusion period" shall mean the six months immediately following the effective date of this clause.(D) "Purchaser" shall mean an individual who places an order and pays the purchase price by cash or credit during the exclusion period even if delivery takes place after the exclusion period.(E) "Stroller" shall mean a wheeled vehicle designed to transport children under 36 months of age and which is powered by an individual pushing or pulling on a handle.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2452PN3267 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223